District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.02

Establishment of the Department of Forensic Sciences.

(a)

There is established as a subordinate agency in the executive branch of the government of the District of Columbia, the Department of Forensic Sciences.

(b)

The mission of the Department shall be to provide high-quality, timely, accurate, and reliable forensic science services with:

(1)

The use of best practices and best available technology;

(2)

A focus on unbiased science and transparency; and

(3)

The goal of enhancing public safety.

History

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 3, 58 DCR 5403

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-1501.01.